Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Chapter 33. Registration of Sex Offenders

§§ 45-33-1 through 45-33-19.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2000, ch. 499, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§45-33-1. [Laws, 1994, ch. 514, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 595, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 454, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 358, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 1998).]

§45-33-3. [Laws, 1994, ch. 514, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 595, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 454, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1997).]

§45-33-5. [Laws, 1994, ch. 514, § 3; Laws, 1995, ch. 595, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 454, § 3; Laws, 1998, ch. 358, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 1998).]

§45-33-7. [Laws, 1994, ch. 514, § 4; Laws, 1995, ch. 595, § 4; Laws, 1996, ch. 325, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1996).]

§45-33-9. [Laws, 1994, ch. 514, § 5; Laws, 1995, ch. 595, § 5; Laws, 1997, ch. 454, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1997).]

§45-33-11. [Laws, 1994, ch. 514, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

§45-33-13. [Laws, 1994, ch. 514, § 7; Laws, 1995, ch. 595, § 6; Laws, 1997, ch. 454, § 5; Laws, 1998, ch. 358, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 1998).]

§45-33-15. [Laws, 1994, ch. 514, § 8; Laws, 1995, ch. 595, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1995.]

§45-33-17. [Laws, 1995, ch. 595, § 8; Laws, 1998, ch. 358, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 1998).]

§45-33-19. [Laws, 1995, ch. 595, § 9; Laws, 1997, ch. 454, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1997).]

§ 45-33-21.
Legislative findings and declaration of purpose.

The Legislature finds that the danger of recidivism posed by criminal sex offenders and the protection of the public from these offenders is of paramount concern and interest to government. The Legislature further finds that law enforcement agencies’ efforts to protect their communities, conduct investigations, and quickly apprehend criminal sex offenders are impaired by the lack of information shared with the public, which lack of information may result in the failure of the criminal justice system to identify, investigate, apprehend, and prosecute criminal sex offenders.

The Legislature further finds that the system of registering criminal sex offenders is a proper exercise of the state’s police power regulating present and ongoing conduct. Comprehensive registration and periodic address verification will provide law enforcement with additional information critical to preventing sexual victimization and to resolving promptly incidents involving sexual abuse and exploitation. It will allow law enforcement agencies to alert the public when necessary for the continued protection of the community.

Persons found to have committed a sex offense have a reduced expectation of privacy because of the public’s interest in safety and in the effective operation of government. In balancing offenders’ due process and other rights, and the interests of public security, the Legislature finds that releasing such information about criminal sex offenders to the general public will further the primary governmental interest of protecting vulnerable populations and, in some instances the public, from potential harm.

Therefore, the state’s policy is to assist local law enforcement agencies’ efforts to protect their communities by requiring criminal sex offenders to register, to record their addresses of residence, to be photographed and fingerprinted, and to authorize the release of necessary and relevant information about criminal sex offenders to the public as provided in this chapter, which may be referred to as the Mississippi Sex Offenders Registration Law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 499, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 45-33-23.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Conviction” means that, regarding the person’s offense, there has been a determination or judgment of guilt as a result of a trial or the entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere regardless of whether adjudication is withheld. “Conviction of similar offenses” includes, but is not limited to, a conviction by a federal or military tribunal, including a court-martial conducted by the Armed Forces of the United States, a conviction for an offense committed on an Indian Reservation or other federal property, a conviction in any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa, the Northern Marianna Islands or the United States Virgin Islands, and a conviction in a foreign country if the foreign country’s judicial system is such that it satisfies minimum due process set forth in the guidelines under Section 111(5)(B) Public Law 109-248.

“Department” means the Mississippi Department of Public Safety unless otherwise specified.

“Jurisdiction” means any court or locality including any state court, federal court, military court, Indian tribunal or foreign court, the fifty (50) states, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa, the Northern Marianna Islands or the United States Virgin Islands, and Indian tribes that elect to function as registration jurisdictions under Title 1, SORNA Section 127 of the Adam Walsh Child Safety Act.

“Permanent residence” means a place where the person abides, lodges, or resides for a period of fourteen (14) or more consecutive days.

“Registration” means providing information to the appropriate agency within the timeframe specified as required by this chapter.

“Registration duties” means obtaining the registration information required on the form specified by the department as well as the photograph, fingerprints and biological sample of the registrant. Biological samples are to be forwarded to the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory pursuant to Section 45-33-37; the photograph, fingerprints and other registration information are to be forwarded to the Department of Public Safety immediately.

“Responsible agency” is defined as the person or government entity whose duty it is to obtain information from a criminal sex offender upon conviction and to transmit that information to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety.

For a criminal sex offender being released from the custody of the Department of Corrections, the responsible agency is the Department of Corrections.

For a criminal sex offender being released from a county jail, the responsible agency is the sheriff of that county.

For a criminal sex offender being released from a municipal jail, the responsible agency is the police department of that municipality.

For a sex offender in the custody of the youth court, the responsible agency is the youth court.

For a criminal sex offender who is being placed on probation, including conditional discharge or unconditional discharge, without any sentence of incarceration, the responsible agency is the sentencing court.

For an offender who has been committed to a mental institution following an acquittal by reason of insanity, the responsible agency is the facility from which the offender is released. Specifically, the director of the facility shall notify the Department of Public Safety before the offender’s release.

For a criminal sex offender who is being released from a jurisdiction outside this state or who has a prior conviction in another jurisdiction and who is to reside, work or attend school in this state, the responsible agency is both the sheriff of the proposed county of residence and the department.

“Sex offense” or “registrable offense” means any of the following offenses:

Section 97-3-53 relating to kidnapping, if the victim was below the age of eighteen (18);

Section 97-3-65 relating to rape; however, conviction or adjudication under Section 97-3-65(1)(a) when the offender was eighteen (18) years of age or younger at the time of the alleged offense, shall not be a registrable sex offense;

Section 97-3-71 relating to rape and assault with intent to ravish;

Section 97-3-95 relating to sexual battery; however, conviction or adjudication under Section 97-3-95(1)(c) when the offender was eighteen (18) years of age or younger at the time of the alleged offense, shall not be a registrable sex offense;

Section 97-5-5 relating to enticing a child for concealment, prostitution or marriage;

Section 97-5-23 relating to the touching of a child, mentally defective or incapacitated person or physically helpless person for lustful purposes;

Section 97-5-27 relating to the dissemination of sexually oriented material to children;

Section 97-5-33 relating to the exploitation of children;

Section 97-5-41 relating to the carnal knowledge of a stepchild, adopted child or child of a cohabiting partner;

Section 97-29-3 relating to sexual intercourse between teacher and student;

Section 97-29-59 relating to unnatural intercourse;

Section 43-47-18 relating to sexual abuse of a vulnerable person;

Section 97-3-54.1(1)(c) relating to procuring sexual servitude of a minor and Section 97-3-54.3 relating to aiding, abetting or conspiring to violate Section 97-3-54.1(1)(c);

Section 97-29-61(2) relating to voyeurism when the victim is a child under sixteen (16) years of age;

Section 97-29-63 relating to filming another without permission where there is an expectation of privacy;

Section 97-29-45(1)(a) relating to obscene electronic communication;

Section 97-3-104 relating to the crime of sexual activity between law enforcement, correctional or custodial personnel and prisoners;

Section 97-5-39(1)(e) relating to contributing to the neglect or delinquency of a child, felonious abuse or battery of a child, if the victim was sexually abused;

Section 97-29-51 relating to procuring or promoting prostitution when the victim is a child under eighteen (18) years of age;

Section 97-1-7 relating to attempt to commit any of the offenses referenced in this paragraph (h);

Any other offense resulting in a conviction in another jurisdiction which, if committed in this state, would be deemed to be such a crime without regard to its designation elsewhere;

Any offense resulting in a conviction in another jurisdiction for which registration is required in the jurisdiction where the conviction was had;

Any conviction of conspiracy to commit, accessory to commission, or attempt to commit any offense listed in this section;

Capital murder when one (1) of the above-described offenses is the underlying crime.

“Temporary residence” is defined as any place where the person abides, lodges, or resides for a period of seven (7) or more consecutive days which is not the person’s permanent residence.

“Address” means the actual physical street address of a person’s permanent or temporary residence. For a person who is homeless but is subject to registration under this chapter, the address information must provide a specific description of where the person habitually lives; the term “homeless” or similar description does not constitute an address within the contemplation of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 499, § 2; Laws, 2001, ch. 500, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 328, § 3; Laws, 2006, ch. 563, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 583, § 7; Laws, 2007, ch. 392, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 411, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 359, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 557, § 3; Laws, 2013, ch. 521, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 452, § 9; Laws, 2016, ch. 362, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 6, 2016); Laws, 2019, ch. 405, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 45-33-25.
Registration with Mississippi Department of Public Safety of persons convicted of or acquitted by reason of insanity of registrable offenses residing, employed or attending school in Mississippi; registration information; prohibition against registered sex offenders living within specified distance of schools, certain child care facilities or agencies or playgrounds or other recreational facilities utilized by children.

Any person having a permanent or temporary residence in this state or who is employed or attending school in this state who has been convicted of a registrable offense in this state or another jurisdiction or who has been acquitted by reason of insanity of a registrable offense in this state or another jurisdiction shall register with the responsible agency and the Mississippi Department of Public Safety. Registration shall not be required for an offense that is not a registrable sex offense or for an offender who is under fourteen (14) years of age. The department shall provide the initial registration information as well as every change of name, change of address, change of status at a school, or other change of information as required by the department to the sheriff of the county of the residence address of the registrant, the sheriff of the county of the employment address, and the sheriff of the county of the school address, if applicable, and any other jurisdiction of the registrant through either written notice, electronic or telephone transmissions, or online access to registration information. Further, the department shall provide this information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation. Additionally, upon notification by the registrant that he intends to reside outside the State of Mississippi, the department shall notify the appropriate state law enforcement agency of any state to which a registrant is moving or has moved.

Any person having a permanent or temporary residence or who is employed or attending school in this state who has been adjudicated delinquent for a registrable sex offense listed in this paragraph that involved use of force against the victim shall register as a sex offender with the responsible agency and shall personally appear at a Mississippi Department of Public Safety Driver’s License Station within three (3) business days of registering with the responsible agency:

Section 97-3-71 relating to rape and assault with intent to ravish;

Section 97-3-95 relating to sexual battery;

Section 97-3-65 relating to statutory rape; or

Conspiracy to commit, accessory to the commission of, or attempt to commit any offense listed in this paragraph.

Any person required to register under this chapter shall submit the following information at the time of registration:

Name, including a former name which has been legally changed;

Street address of all current permanent and temporary residences within state or out of state at which the sex offender resides or habitually lives, including dates of temporary lodgings. There is a presumption that a registrant owes a duty of updating registration information if:

The registrant remains away from a registered address for seven (7) or more consecutive days; or

If the registrant remains at another address between the hours of 10:00 p.m. and 6:00 a.m. for more than seven (7) consecutive days;

Date, place and address of employment, including as a volunteer or unpaid intern or as a transient or day laborer;

Crime for which charged, arrested or convicted;

Date and place of conviction, adjudication or acquittal by reason of insanity;

Aliases used or nicknames, ethnic or tribal names by which commonly known;

Social security number and any purported social security number or numbers;

Date and place of birth and any purported date and place of birth;

Age, race, sex, height, weight, hair and eye colors, and any other physical description or identifying factors;

A brief description of the offense or offenses for which the registration is required;

Driver’s license or state or other jurisdiction identification card number, which license or card may be electronically accessed by the Department of Public Safety;

Anticipated future residence;

If the registrant’s residence is a motor vehicle, trailer, mobile home or manufactured home, the registrant shall also provide vehicle identification number, license tag number, registration number and a description, including color scheme, of the motor vehicle, trailer, mobile home or manufactured home; if the registrant’s place of residence is a vessel or houseboat, the registrant shall also provide the hull identification number, manufacturer’s serial number, name of the vessel or houseboat, registration number and a description, including color scheme, of the vessel or houseboat, including permanent or frequent locations where the motor vehicle, trailer, mobile home, manufactured home, vessel or houseboat is kept;

Vehicle make, model, color and license tag number for all vehicles owned or operated by the sex offender, whether for work or personal use, and the permanent or frequent locations where a vehicle is kept;

Offense history;

Photograph;

Fingerprints and palm prints;

Documentation of any treatment received for any mental abnormality or personality disorder of the person;

Biological sample;

Name of any public or private educational institution, including any secondary school, trade or professional institution or institution of higher education at which the offender is employed, carries on a vocation (with or without compensation) or is enrolled as a student, or will be enrolled as a student, and the registrant’s status;

Copy of conviction or sentencing order for the sex offense for which registration is required;

The offender’s parole, probation or supervised release status and the existence of any outstanding arrest warrants;

Every online identity, screen name or username used, registered or created by a registrant;

Professional licensing information which authorizes the registrant to engage in an occupation or carry out a trade or occupation;

Information from passport and immigration documents;

All telephone numbers, including, but not limited to, permanent residence, temporary residence, cell phone and employment phone numbers, whether landlines or cell phones; and

Any other information deemed necessary.

For purposes of this chapter, a person is considered to be residing in this state if he maintains a permanent or temporary residence as defined in Section 45-33-23, including students, temporary employees and military personnel on assignment.

A person required to register under this chapter shall not reside within three thousand (3,000) feet of the real property comprising a public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school, a child care facility, a residential child-caring agency, a children’s group care home or any playground, ballpark or other recreational facility utilized by persons under the age of eighteen (18) years.

A person residing within three thousand (3,000) feet of the real property comprising a public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school or a child care facility does not commit a violation of this subsection if any of the following apply:

The person is serving a sentence at a jail, prison, juvenile facility or other correctional institution or facility.

The person is subject to an order of commitment under Title 41, Mississippi Code of 1972.

The person established the subject residence before July 1, 2006.

The school or child care facility is established within three thousand (3,000) feet of the person’s residence subsequent to the date the person established residency.

The person established the subject residence between July 1, 2006, and January 1, 2014, in a location at least one thousand five hundred (1,500) feet from the school or child care facility.

The person is a minor or a ward under a guardianship.

A person residing within three thousand (3,000) feet of the real property comprising a residential child-caring agency, a children’s group care home or any playground, ballpark or other recreational facility utilized by persons under the age of eighteen (18) years does not commit a violation of this subsection if any of the following apply:

The person established the subject residence before July 1, 2008.

The residential child-caring agency, children’s group care home, playground, ballpark or other recreational facility utilized by persons under the age of eighteen (18) years is established within three thousand (3,000) feet of the person’s residence subsequent to the date the person established residency.

The person established the subject residence between July 1, 2008, and January 1, 2014, in a location at least one thousand five hundred (1,500) feet from the residential child-caring agency, children’s group care home, playground, ballpark or other recreational facility utilized by persons under the age of eighteen (18) years.

Any of the conditions described in subsection (4)(b)(i), (ii) or (vi) exist.

The Department of Public Safety is required to obtain the text of the law defining the offense or offenses for which the registration is required.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 499, § 3; Laws, 2001, ch. 500, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 566, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 392, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 424, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 359, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 521, § 2, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2014.

§ 45-33-26.
Prohibition against sex offender being present in or within a certain distance of school building or school property or in or about any public beach or public campground where minor children congregate; exemptions; penalties.

Unless exempted under subsection (2), it is unlawful for a person required to register as a sex offender under Section 45-33-25:

To be present in any school building, on real property comprising any school, or in any conveyance owned, leased or contracted by a school to transport students to or from school or a school-related activity when persons under the age of eighteen (18) are present in the building, on the grounds or in the conveyance; or

To loiter within five hundred (500) feet of a school building or real property comprising any school while persons under the age of eighteen (18) are present in the building or on the grounds.

It is unlawful for a person required to register as a sex offender under Section 45-33-25 to visit or be in or about any public beach or public campground where minor children congregate without advance approval from the Director of the Department of Public Safety Sex Offender Registry, and the registrant is required to immediately report any incidental contact with minor children to the director.

A person required to register as a sex offender who is a parent or guardian of a student attending the school and who complies with subsection (3) may be present on school property if the parent or guardian is:

Attending a conference at the school with school personnel to discuss the progress of the sex offender’s child academically or socially;

Participating in child review conferences in which evaluation and placement decisions may be made with respect to the sex offender’s child regarding special education services;

Attending conferences to discuss other student issues concerning the sex offender’s child such as retention and promotion;

Transporting the sex offender’s child to and from school; or

Present at the school because the presence of the sex offender has been requested by the principal for any other reason relating to the welfare of the child.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to a sex offender who is legally enrolled in a particular school or is participating in a school-sponsored educational program located at a particular school when the sex offender is present at that school.

In order to exercise the exemption under subsection (2), a parent or guardian who is required to register as a sex offender must notify the principal of the school of the sex offender’s presence at the school unless the offender: (i) has permission to be present from the superintendent or the school board, or (ii) the principal has granted ongoing permission for regular visits of a routine nature.

If permission is granted by the superintendent or the school board, the superintendent or school board president must inform the principal of the school where the sex offender will be present. Notification includes the nature of the sex offender’s visit and the hours when the sex offender will be present in the school, and the sex offender is responsible for notifying the principal’s office upon arrival and upon departure. If the sex offender is to be present in the vicinity of children, the sex offender has the duty to remain under the direct supervision of a school official.

For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“School” means a public or private preschool, elementary school or secondary school.

“Loiter” means standing or sitting idly, whether in or out of a vehicle, or remaining in or around school property without a legitimate reason.

“School official” means the principal, a teacher, any other certified employee of the school, the superintendent of schools, or a member of the school board.

A sex offender who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), incarceration not to exceed six (6) months in jail, or both.

It is a defense to prosecution under this section that the sex offender did not know and could not reasonably know that the property or conveyance fell within the proscription of this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to infringe upon the constitutional right of a sex offender to be present in a school building that is used as a polling place for the purpose of voting.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 595, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 410, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 45-33-27.
Time frame and place for registration of offenders.

A person required to register on the basis of a conviction, adjudication of delinquency or acquittal by reason of insanity entered shall register with the responsible agency within three (3) business days of the date of judgment unless the person is immediately confined or committed, in which case the person shall register before release in accordance with the procedures established by the department. The responsible agency shall immediately forward the registration information to the Department of Public Safety. The person is also required to personally appear at a Department of Public Safety Driver’s License Station within three (3) days of registration with the responsible agency and to obtain a sex offender registration card.

If a person who is required to register under this section is released from prison or placed on parole or supervised release or in a restitution center or community work center, the Department of Corrections shall perform the registration duties before placement in a center or before release and immediately forward the registration information to the Department of Public Safety. The person is also required to personally appear at a Department of Public Safety Driver’s License Station within three (3) days of release or placement in a restitution center or community work center.

If a person required to register under this section is placed on probation, the court, at the time of entering the order, shall register the person and immediately forward the registration information to the Department of Public Safety. The person is also required to personally appear at a Department of Public Safety Driver’s License Station within three (3) days of the entry of the order.

Any person required to register who is neither incarcerated, detained nor committed at the time the requirement to register attaches shall present himself to the county sheriff to register within three (3) business days, and shall personally appear at a Department of Public Safety Driver’s License Station within three (3) days of the time the requirement to register attaches.

An offender moving to or returning to this state from another jurisdiction shall notify the Department of Public Safety ten (10) days before the person first resides in or returns to this state and shall present himself to the sheriff of the county of his residence within three (3) business days after first residing in or returning to a county of this state to provide the required registration information. The person is also required to register by personally appearing at a Department of Public Safety Driver’s License Station within three (3) days after first residing in or moving to a county of this state. If the offender fails to appear for registration as required in this state, the department shall notify the other jurisdiction of the failure to register.

A person, other than a person confined in a correctional or juvenile detention facility or involuntarily committed on the basis of mental illness, who is required to register on the basis of a sex offense for which a conviction, adjudication of delinquency or acquittal by reason of insanity was entered shall register with the sheriff of the county in which he resides no later than August 15, 2000, or within three (3) business days of first residing in or returning to a county of this state.

Every person required to register shall show proof of domicile. The commissioner shall promulgate any rules and regulations necessary to enforce this requirement and shall prescribe the means by which such person may show domicile.

Any driver’s license photograph, I.D. photograph, sex offender photograph, fingerprint, driver’s license application and/or anything submitted to the Department of Public Safety by a known convicted sex offender, registered or not registered, can be used by the Department of Public Safety or any other authorized law enforcement agency for any means necessary in registration, identification, investigation regarding their tracking or identification.

The department will assist local law enforcement agencies in the effort to conduct address and other verifications of registered sex offenders and will assist in the location and apprehension of noncompliant sex offenders.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 499, § 4; Laws, 2001, ch. 500, § 3; Laws, 2005, ch. 353, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 563, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 392, § 3; Laws, 2011, ch. 359, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 45-33-28.
Notification of emergency shelter management of person’s sex offender status upon entering shelter during declaration of emergency; notification of law enforcement officials of presence of sex offender in shelter.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the contrary, during a declaration of emergency, any person who has been required to register as a sex offender as provided in this chapter who enters an emergency shelter, within the first twenty-four (24) hours of admittance, shall notify the management of the facility, the sheriff of the county in which the shelter is located and the chief of police of the municipality, if the shelter is located in a municipality, of the person’s sex offender status. The sex offender shall provide his full name, date of birth, social security number, and last address of registration prior to the declaration of emergency. Within seventy-two (72) hours of receiving the notification required by the provisions of this subsection, the sheriff and chief of police shall forward that information to the department.

The manager or director of the emergency shelter shall make a reasonable effort to notify the chief law enforcement officer of the county or municipality in which the shelter is located of the presence of the sex offender in the emergency shelter. No person associated with a nonprofit organization that operates an emergency shelter shall be liable for any injury or claim arising out of the failure of the manager or operator to communicate the presence of a sex offender in the shelter to the appropriate law enforcement official.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 359, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 45-33-29.
Address change notification; change in enrollment, employment or vocation status at any educational institution; change of employment or name; change of vehicle information; change of e-mail address or other designation used in Internet communications.

Upon any change of address, including temporary lodging, an offender required to register under this chapter is required to personally appear at a Department of Public Safety Driver’s License Station not less than ten (10) days before he intends to first reside at the new address.

Upon any change in the status of a registrant’s enrollment, employment or vocation at any public or private educational institution, including any secondary school, trade or professional institution or institution of higher education, the offender is required to personally appear at a Department of Public Safety Driver’s License Station within three (3) business days of the change.

Upon any change of employment or change of name, a registrant is required to personally appear at a Department of Public Safety Driver’s License Station within three (3) business days of the change.

Upon any change of vehicle information, a registrant is required to report the change on an appropriate form supplied by the department within three (3) business days of the change.

Upon any change of e-mail address or addresses, instant message address or addresses, or any other designation used in Internet communications, postings or telephone communications, a registrant is required to report the change on an appropriate form supplied by the department within three (3) business days of the change.

Upon any change of information deemed by the department to be necessary to the state’s policy to assist local law enforcement agencies’ efforts to protect their communities, a registrant is required to report the change on an appropriate form supplied by the department within three (3) business days of the change.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 499, § 5; Laws, 2001, ch. 500, § 4; Laws, 2005, ch. 353, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 563, § 3; Laws, 2007, ch. 392, § 4; Laws, 2011, ch. 359, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 45-33-31.
Reregistration.

Registrants who are in compliance with a program of electronic monitoring under this chapter are required to reregister annually.

All other registrants are required to personally appear at a Department of Public Safety Driver’s License Station to reregister every ninety (90) days.

Reregistration includes the submission of current information and photograph to the department and the verification of registration information, including the street address and telephone number of the registrant; name, street address and telephone number of the registrant’s employment or status at a school, along with any other registration information that may need to be verified and the payment of any required fees.

A person who fails to reregister and obtain a renewal sex offender registration card as required by this section commits a violation of this chapter. The Department of Public Safety will immediately notify any sheriff or other jurisdiction of any changes in information including residence address, employment and status at a school if that jurisdiction, county or municipality is affected by the change.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 499, § 6; Laws, 2001, ch. 500, § 5; Laws, 2005, ch. 353, § 3; Laws, 2006, ch. 563, § 4; Laws, 2007, ch. 392, § 5; Laws, 2011, ch. 359, § 6; Laws, 2013, ch. 521, § 5, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2014.

§ 45-33-32.
Disclosure by sex offenders volunteering for organizations serving minors under the age of 18.

A person convicted of a sex offense who volunteers for an organization in which volunteers have direct, private and unsupervised contact with minors under the age of eighteen (18) shall notify the organization of the person’s conviction at the time of volunteering. Such notification must be in writing to the organization. Any organization which accepts volunteers must notify volunteers of this disclosure requirement upon application of the volunteer to serve or prior to acceptance of any of the volunteer’s service, whichever occurs first.

If the organization, after notification by the offender as provided in subsection (1), accepts the offender as a volunteer, the organization shall make reasonable attempts to notify the parents or guardians of any minors under the age of eighteen (18) involved in the organization of the offender’s criminal record.

This section applies to all registered sex offenders regardless of the date of conviction.

Any person previously registered as a sex offender and who has a continuing obligation to be registered as a sex offender shall be notified of the person’s duty under this section with the first reregistration form to be sent to the person after July 1, 2004.

If the registered sex offender is currently volunteering for such an organization, the sex offender must resign or notify the organization immediately upon receipt of notice or be subject to the penalties of this chapter.

An organization acting in good faith in making the notification to parents or guardians under this section, or who fails in good faith to make such notification, shall not be liable in any civil or criminal action as a result of the notification or failure to notify.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 493, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004; Laws, 2019, ch. 405, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019.